Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF HASTINGS WATER TREATMENT PLANTS; 3M SETTLEMENT MONEY TRANSFER.new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must transfer $45,700,000 in fiscal year 2026 from money appropriated to the commissioner from the water quality and sustainability account in the remediation fund established under Minnesota Statutes, section 115B.52, to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Hastings to predesign, design, construct, and equip three water treatment plants and associated water mains to remove perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) from city wells. Money transferred under this section is available until June 30, 2029. new text end